Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-153] Operating motorcycles on
roadways laned for traffic. (a) All motorcycles are entitled to full use
of a lane and no motor vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive
any motorcycle of the full use of a lane. This subsection shall not apply to
motorcycles operated two abreast in a single lane.

(b) The operator of a motorcycle shall not
overtake and pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken.

(c) No person shall operate a motorcycle
between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.

(d) Motorcycles shall not be operated more
than two abreast in a single lane.

(e) Subsections (b) and (c) shall not apply to
police officers in the performance of their official duties. [L 1971, c 150, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next